Georgia statutes. TITLE 4 Animals
Article 1 Livestock Dealers

Cross references.

Duty of Commissioner to inspect cattle, sheep, swine, and other animals before entry into slaughtering, packing, or similar establishments, §

26-2-102

.

4-6-1.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the term:

“Cash” includes only currency, cashier’s checks, and money orders.

“Dealer” means any person or agent of such person who engages in or facilitates, including by electronic means, the business of buying, selling, exchanging, or otherwise transferring ownership of livestock within this state for his or her own account or for that of another; provided, however, that the term “dealer” shall not include:

Farmers acquiring livestock solely for the purpose of grazing and feeding as a part of their farm operations;

Packers whose total annual purchases of livestock are less than $50,000.00 who buy only from licensed dealers and licensed sales establishments;

Persons selling only livestock of their own production or buying only for their own production; or

Persons auctioning livestock on behalf of a third party.

“Livestock” means cattle, swine, equines, sheep, and goats of all kinds and species.

“Livestock market operator” means any person engaged in the business of operating a sales establishment, public auctions or sales of livestock, or barns and yards for the containment of livestock held for the purpose of auction or sale.

“Person” means any person, firm, corporation, association, cooperative, or combination thereof.

“Sales establishment” means any yard, barn, or other premises where livestock is sold at auction.

“Surety” means a letter of credit, certificate of deposit, or other written instrument issued or executed by a lending institution or bonding, surety, or insurance company licensed to do business in this state, guaranteeing the faithful performance of the terms of the contract of purchase, including the payment of the purchase price of all livestock purchased by the holder of such instrument, made payable to the Commissioner for the benefit of persons sustaining loss resulting from the nonpayment of the purchase price or the failure to fulfill the terms of the contract of purchase.

History.

Ga. L. 1952, p. 184, § 1; Ga. L. 1983, p. 1161, § 1; Ga. L. 1995, p. 244, § 8; Ga. L. 1996, p. 351, § 1; Ga. L. 2008, p. 458, § 6/SB 364; Ga. L. 2017, p. 129, § 1/HB 49.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, deleted former paragraph (1), which read: “ ‘Bond’ means a written instrument issued or executed by a bonding, surety, or insurance company licensed to do business in this state, guaranteeing that the person bonded shall faithfully fulfill the terms of the contract of purchases and guarantee the payment of the purchase price of all livestock purchased by him, made payable to the Commissioner for the benefit of persons sustaining loss resulting from the nonpayment of the purchase price or the failure to fulfill the terms of the contract of purchase.”; redesignated former paragraphs (2) through (7) as present paragraphs (1) through (6), respectively; rewrote paragraph (2); deleted “, firm or corporation” following “person” near the beginning of paragraph (4); and added paragraph (7).

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2017, a quotation mark was deleted following “establishments” at the end of subparagraph (2)(B).

4-6-2.
Sale, auction, transfer, or movement of infected livestock.

No dealer or livestock market operator shall sell, auction, transfer, or move any livestock which are infected with any disease or which have been placed under quarantine by the authority of the Commissioner. Until all such livestock have been inspected by a veterinarian approved by the Commissioner, no dealer or livestock market operator shall sell, auction, transfer, or move any livestock which have been infected, which are suspected of being infected, or which are likely to have been exposed to infection. No dealer or livestock market operator shall sell, auction, transfer, or move any livestock from any barn, yard, or premises unless all sanitary practices and precautions prescribed by the rules and regulations of the Commissioner have been observed in the premises, barn, or yard.

History.

Ga. L. 1952, p. 184, § 2; Ga. L. 1983, p. 1161, § 1; Ga. L. 2017, p. 129, § 2/HB 49.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, deleted “, broker,” following “dealer” throughout this Code section.

Cross references.

Making of implied warranties by companies auctioning cattle, hogs, or sheep, §

11-2-316

.

4-6-3.
Licenses — Required; fee; term; surety requirement.

No livestock market operator shall engage in or carry on such business without first applying for and obtaining a license from the Commissioner. The triennial fee for a livestock market operator license shall be proportionate to the surety acquired by such operator, but shall not exceed $200.00.

No dealer who buys or sells through a livestock market operator or directly from producers shall engage in or carry on such business without first applying for and obtaining a license from the Commissioner. The triennial fee for a dealer license shall be no more than $25.00.

No license shall be issued to any person pursuant to this Code section unless the applicant therefor furnishes to the Commissioner the surety required under this article and such surety is approved by the Commissioner. Any and all surety applications shall be accompanied by a certificate of “good standing” issued by the Commissioner of Insurance. If any company issuing a surety shall become unauthorized to do business in this state, it shall be the duty of the Commissioner of Insurance to notify the Commissioner of Agriculture within 30 days. Such sureties shall be conditioned to secure the faithful performance of a person’s obligations as a livestock market operator or dealer under this article and the rules and regulations prescribed pursuant thereto. If the surety of a dealer or livestock market operator is canceled, then the license of such person shall immediately be revoked by operation of law without notice or hearing.

History.

Ga. L. 1952, p. 184, § 3; Ga. L. 1958, p. 386, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 4; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1804, § 1; Ga. L. 1983, p. 1161, § 1; Ga. L. 1999, p. 800, § 5; Ga. L. 2017, p. 129, § 3/HB 49.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, rewrote this Code section.

Cross references.

Exemption from municipal property taxes and license fees for sale or introduction into municipality of agricultural products raised in state, §

48-5-356

.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Licensing and bonding requirements, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Rules of Georgia Department of Agriculture, Chapter 40-13-7.

4-6-4.
Licenses — Revocation, cancellation, or suspension.

Every licensed dealer and livestock market operator who shall violate this chapter or rules and regulations established by the Commissioner pursuant to this chapter shall have his or her license revoked, canceled, or suspended, upon a notice and hearing.

History.

Ga. L. 1952, p. 184, § 5; Ga. L. 1983, p. 1161, § 1; Ga. L. 2017, p. 129, § 4/HB 49.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, in this Code section, deleted “, broker,” following “dealer” near the beginning and inserted “or her” near the end.

4-6-5.
Maintenance of records.

No dealer or livestock market operator shall buy, store, or otherwise receive any livestock without first recording the name and address of the person or persons bringing in the livestock and recording the license tag number of the vehicle used to transport the livestock.

History.

Ga. L. 1963, p. 541, § 1; Ga. L. 1983, p. 1161, § 1; Ga. L. 2017, p. 129, § 5/HB 49.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, in this Code section, deleted “, broker,” following “dealer” near the beginning and deleted “by the person or persons” following “vehicle used” near the end.

4-6-6.
Quarantine of premises; promulgation of rules and regulations prescribing sanitary standards.

In the control, suppression, prevention, and eradication of livestock diseases, the Commissioner or any duly authorized livestock inspector acting under the authority of this or any other livestock law of this state is authorized and required to quarantine any premises or any area when he shall determine that livestock in such place or places are infected with a contagious or infectious disease, that the unsanitary condition of such place or places might cause the spread of such disease, or that the owner or occupant of such place or places is not observing sanitary practices.

The Commissioner is authorized and empowered to adopt and promulgate rules and regulations prescribing the sanitary standards and requirements for the prevention, control, suppression, and eradication of livestock diseases in this state, such regulations to be no less adequate for the protection of the livestock industry and public health than those of the secretary of agriculture of the United States Department of Agriculture.

History.

Ga. L. 1952, p. 184, § 6; Ga. L. 1983, p. 1161, § 1.

4-6-7.
Rules and regulations — Promulgation and enforcement generally.

The Commissioner is authorized to formulate, adopt, promulgate, and enforce rules and regulations for the purpose of carrying this chapter into effect.

History.

Ga. L. 1952, p. 184, § 4; Ga. L. 1983, p. 1161, § 1.

4-6-8.
Rules and regulations — Administrative remedies of persons aggrieved by promulgation or enforcement.

Any person affected by any rule or regulation adopted and promulgated by the Commissioner pursuant to any statute conferring such authority upon him, who believes that the Commissioner, in the promulgation of such rules and regulations or in the enforcement thereof, has gone beyond the authority vested in him by law or who believes that the Commissioner has exceeded any power which the legislature of this state under the Constitution of the United States or the Constitution of Georgia conferred upon him, is given the right to protest or object in writing to such rule or regulation or any act done by the Commissioner pursuant to such rule or regulation, as he may believe violates the legal and constitutional authority of the Commissioner, by pointing out in what respect and for what reasons he contends the act, rules, or regulations to be improper or illegal. The Commissioner is required to consider every such objection and afford the aggrieved party opportunity to submit evidence and argument in support of his protest; and if, in his judgment, the protest is in whole or in part well founded, the Commissioner shall take such corrective measures as are necessary to give the aggrieved party relief in every respect from any illegal or unconstitutional requirement. This Code section is expressly made an administrative remedy and every person affected by any rule, regulation, or act of the Commissioner is required to exhaust this remedy before pursuing any other remedy, provided that nothing contained in this chapter shall be construed to deny any applicant for a license any existing right to a review by the court of the Commissioner’s action as now provided by law.

History.

Ga. L. 1952, p. 184, § 8; Ga. L. 1983, p. 1161, § 1.

4-6-9.
Injunctions.

In addition to the remedies provided in this chapter and notwithstanding the existence of an adequate remedy at law, the Commissioner is authorized to apply to the superior courts of this state for injunctions. Such courts shall have the jurisdiction, for good cause shown, to grant temporary or permanent injunctions or temporary restraining orders restraining or enjoining any person, firm, corporation, or association from violating or continuing to violate this chapter or any rule or regulation promulgated pursuant to this chapter. Such injunction or order shall be issued without bond and may be granted notwithstanding the fact that the violation constitutes a criminal act and notwithstanding the pendency of any criminal prosecution for the same violation.

History.

Ga. L. 1972, p. 745, § 2; Ga. L. 1983, p. 1161, § 1.

4-6-10.
Penalty for violations of chapter or rules or regulations.

Any dealer or livestock market operator who violates any of the provisions of this chapter, any quarantine provision, or any rule or regulation established by the Commissioner under the authority of this or any other law for the protection of the general public in the prevention of livestock diseases shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

Any dealer or livestock market operator who violates Code Section 4-6-5, relating to maintenance of records, for a third or subsequent time shall be guilty of a felony and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine not to exceed $10,000.00 or by imprisonment for not less than one nor more than three years, or both, and any person so convicted shall have any license issued under this article permanently revoked and shall be ineligible to apply for a subsequent license under this article.

Any dealer or livestock market operator who violates Code Section 4-6-2, relating to the sale, auction, or transfer of infected livestock, or Code Section 4-6-6, relating to quarantines, for the third or subsequent time shall be guilty of a felony and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine not to exceed $10,000.00 or by imprisonment for not less than one nor more than three years, or both, and any person so convicted shall have any license issued under this article permanently revoked and shall be ineligible to apply for a subsequent license under this article.

History.

Ga. L. 1952, p. 184, § 7; Ga. L. 1983, p. 1161, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 704, § 2; Ga. L. 2017, p. 129, § 6/HB 49.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, in this Code section, deleted “, broker,” following “dealer” throughout, and deleted “known” preceding “infected livestock” near the middle of subsection (c).

4-6-11.
Liability of purchaser or seller of leased livestock to owner or lessor of livestock.

A person who purchases leased livestock from or a commission merchant who sells leased livestock for the lessee of such livestock shall not be liable to the owner or lessor of such livestock unless the livestock are clearly marked or branded with a mark or brand registered by the owner or lessor with the department and, prior to the purchase or sale, the purchaser or commission merchant has received written notice of the owner’s or lessor’s ownership interest in such livestock and of the owner’s or lessor’s mark or brand.

History.

Code 1981, §

4-6-11

, enacted by Ga. L. 1991, p. 752, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1642, § 1.

4-6-12.
Publication of licensed dealers and livestock market operators.

The Commissioner shall publish in print or electronically the names and locations of duly licensed dealers and livestock market operators.

History.

Code 1981, §

4-6-12

, enacted by Ga. L. 2017, p. 129, § 7/HB 49.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective July 1, 2017.